Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COOK COUNTY; GUNFLINT TRAIL NATIONAL SCENIC BYWAY IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Cook County to design, engineer, construct, and reconstruct improvements and betterments of a capital nature in Cook County along the northwesternmost ten miles of the Gunflint Trail National Scenic Byway, terminating at Trails End Campground, for: new text end new text begin (1) resurfacing approximately ten miles of failing roadway beginning 46 miles north of Grand Marais on the Gunflint Trail at the intersection with United States Forest Service Road 1347 and ending at the end of the Gunflint Trail at Trails End Campground; new text end new text begin (2) replacement of up to 16 deteriorated culverts throughout the corridor; new text end new text begin (3) construction of up to four bridges; new text end new text begin (4) maintaining and improving reliable emergency access to residents and visitors; and new text end new text begin (5) other related improvements necessary to preserve reliable access to the Boundary Waters Canoe Area Wilderness, Superior National Forest, and associated recreational areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end